


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















About Us | Investment Management | Infinity Capital Partners






































 










Skip to content



Infinity Funds



Investor Portal







								About															





Infinity Capital Partners, LLC
Infinity Capital Partners, LLC (“Infinity”) is an independent, privately owned fund of hedge funds manager based in Atlanta, Georgia. Infinity’s primary goal is to consistently maximize returns relative to risk. Founded in 2002, Infinity is owned and managed by its principal partners. Infinity’s investors include high net worth individuals, family offices, wealth management firms, and institutional investors. The firm’s partners and professionals have significant industry experience and have amassed a track record of success managing alternative investment partnerships.
Approach
Infinity focuses on institutional quality multi-strategy managers with significant long-term track records and industry leading performance. Our underlying managers have exposure to a broad range of strategies across a wide range of security types and regions. Primary strategies include Long/Short Equity, Distressed Securities, Event Driven, Quantitative Equity and Securities Arbitrage.
  



















Vivaldi Asset Management

























Vivaldi Asset Management | 

Registered Funds
Fund Documents
Contact Us
 


 


Breaking Tradition:
       Offering an Alternative Route

					Alternative solutions for efficient portfolio construction				




Alternative Investments

					The process of sourcing and selecting managers
goes beyond simply looking at return and risk statistics.				




Research & Collaboration

					Preservation & Growth				


<
>





Registered Funds

Our solutions are available to retail investors through independent advisors, broker-dealers, and self-directed accounts.



Daily Liquidity



Fund Name
Ticker
Strategy
Structure
PDF Materials



Vivaldi Merger Arbitrage Fund
VARBX (I SHARE)
VARAX (A SHARE)
Merger Arbitrage
1933 & 1940 Act
Open-End Fund
FACT SHEET
PROSPECTUS



Vivaldi Multi-Strategy Fund
OMOIX (I share)
OMOAX (A share)
Multi-Manager
Absolute Return
1933 & 1940 Act
Open-End Fund
FACT SHEET
PROSPECTUS



WV Concentrated Equities Fund
WVCIX (I share)
WVCAX (A share)
Concentrated Equities
1933 & 1940 Act
Open-End Fund
PROSPECTUS






Daily Purchase – Quarterly Tender



Fund Name
Ticker
Strategy
Structure
PDF Materials



The Relative Value Fund
VFLEX (CIA Share)
Multi-Strategy
1933 & 1940 Act
Closed-End Fund
PROSPECTUS






Quarterly Liquidity



Fund Name
Ticker
Strategy
Structure
PDF Materials



Infinity Core Alternative Fund
ZVAMIX
Multi-Strategy, Concentrated
Fund of Hedge Funds
1933 & 1940 Act
Closed-End Fund
FACT SHEET
PROSPECTUS

















Vivaldi Asset Management LLC
225 W. Wacker Drive Suite #2100
Chicago, IL 60606
P: 312.248.8300
F: 847.386.2910


							© 2017 VIVALDI ASSET MANAGEMENT LLC ● ALL RIGHTS RESERVED						






Contact Us 
 

























Message 





















Vivaldi Asset Management is the Adviser to the Infinity Core Alternative Fund, the WV Concentrated Equities Fund, the Vivaldi Merger Arbitrage Fund, The Relative Value Fund, and the Vivaldi Multi-Strategy Fund (collectively, the “Funds.”). The Infinity Core Alternative Fund and The Relative Value Fund are distributed by Foreside Fund Services, LLC. IMST Distributors, LLC is the distributor for the Vivaldi Merger Arbitrage Fund, and the Vivaldi Multi-Strategy Fund, and the WV Concentrated Equities Fund.
Investing involves risk. Principal loss is possible. Diversification does not assure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market.
The Funds should be considered a speculative investment and there is no guarantee the Funds will successfully achieve their investment objective. The Funds are appropriate only for investors who can tolerate a high degree of risk, do not require liquid investment and are able to sustain a complete loss of their investment.
The Funds are also subject to some or all of the following risks: limited operating history; industry concentration risk; non-diversified risk; multi-manager risk; repurchase offers; limited liquidity risk; leverage and derivative risk; legal, tax and regulatory risk; and non-qualification as a regulated investment company under the Code. Investors may also be subject to multiple levels of fees and expenses, underlying manager risk, valuation risk, high portfolio turnover risk, limited control over underlying managers, arbitrage risk, special situation risk, equity, bond and asset-backed securities risk, foreign risk, currency risk, credit risk, distressed securities risk, interest rate risk, IPO risk, small-cap risk, and credit default swaps risk. Please read the appropriate Fund’s prospectus for a detailed explanation of all Fund risks.
Each Fund’s investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses must be considered carefully before investing. The statutory prospectus and summary prospectus contain this and other important information about the investment company and may be obtained by HERE. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.
The Funds are offered only to United States residents, and information on this site is intended only for such persons. Nothing on this web site should be considered a solicitation to buy or an offer to sell shares of any Fund in any jurisdiction where the offer or solicitation would be unlawful under the securities laws of such jurisdiction.























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft










2017 Investment Outlook




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in










Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          

















2017 Investment Outlook


































The Long Cycle Continues





We expect the long post-crisis economic recovery to continue in 2017. As a base case, we think growth is poised to broaden out to more countries, with the global economy drawing on more sources of strength than at any point since 2010.
From an investment perspective, our base case view is broadly supportive for risk assets. We prefer equities over credit and credit over rates, but we expect low returns from these traditional exposures given 1) elevated valuations, 2) limited upside for corporate earnings from current levels and 3) limits to economic growth potential. Broadening exposure beyond conventional stocks and bonds, identifying opportunities in emerging markets and deploying more dynamic asset allocation strategies are some ways to adapt.
In some respects, our outlook represents an extension of the same long cycle we envisioned heading into 2016. The key difference for 2017 revolves around four emerging transitions. Populism is challenging globalism and creating new tail risks. Concerns about low growth are giving way to concerns about inflation. Years of focus on monetary policy are giving way to a close watch over fiscal policy. And concerns about new regulation are acceding to hopes for de-regulation.
Transition will be an evolving theme in 2017, and we will be re-visiting it in our publications throughout the year. In this Investment Outlook, we highlight specific signposts we will be watching, both to gauge the pace of transition and to test our base case view on the key investment questions.









Three Key Questions







Is it time to de-risk?
Is it time to de-risk?
No. We think de-risking would be premature, at
least from a purely return-generating standpoint. We
expect the macro environment to remain supportive
of risk assets during 2017 amid a slow-but-steady
expansion in developed markets and an acceleration
of growth in some emerging markets.

VIEW MORE



What’s driving the expansion?
What’s driving the expansion?
We believe this is a slow-growth recovery best
explained by cyclical economic drivers. We believe
the concerns about the developed world being mired
in a pattern of underinvestment and stalled growth—
so-called secular stagnation—are overdone.

VIEW MORE



Where do we see opportunities?
Where do we see opportunities?
In a low-return world, we look for sources of
return beyond conventional stock and bond market
approaches. We also think range-bound or volatile
markets create opportunities for more dynamic
investment strategies.

VIEW MORE






 
 






Transitions We’re Watching in 2017


















												Globalism to Populism
											



The biggest transition in the current environment is a shift away from globalism to a rising populist trend.















												Stagnation to Inflation
											



We expect concerns around potential secular stagnation to give way to a more inflationary paradigm in the US.















												Monetary to Fiscal Policy
											



The focus for stimulus is shifting toward fiscal spending, as central banks are stretching toward the limits of their easing ability.
















												Regulation to De-Regulation
											



We see the potential for greater regulatory divergence globally and the potential for competitive de-regulation.









2017 GDP Forecasts by Country, Region and Market (%)
We expect the prolonged expansion phase of the growth cycle to continue in 2017
 










Source: GSAM. As of January 2017.






Our 12-Month Cross-Asset Views Compared to 2016
We favor equities and emerging market assets over corporate credit and government bonds
 










Source: GSAM Global Portfolio Solutions (GPS) as of December 2016 and are subject to change. Chart reflects GPS relative asset allocation views and may not be representative of each GSAM portfolio team’s view on opportunities within individual markets.






Related Items











2017 INVESTMENT OUTLOOK
Download the full publication

 
													DOWNLOAD
												





2017 INVESTMENT OUTLOOK CHARTBOOK
Download the chartbook

 
													DOWNLOAD
												















                        
                        
                            Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Featured Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Perspectives
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               




SOLUTIONS FOR






                        
                        
                            About GSAM
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Overview
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News and Media
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Careers
		           		 
					     
						    





















































Alternative Investment Manager Infinity Capital Partners Offers the Infinity Core Alternative Fund Through Vivaldi Asset Management | Hedge Fund News From HedgeCo.Net






























































                                                                    Register free as a Hedge Fund, Investor,  Service Provider or a News Member



HedgeCo.Net - Online Hedge Fund Database and Community
                                     - 
Sign In
                                                                          
                                    











Search













Find a Hedge Fund


Find a Hedge Fund

Search for a Fund
Browse Funds By Strategy
Hedge Fund Ranking
Hedge Fund Manager Interviews







Search Hedge Fund:

Go





Popular Searches

25 Newly Added Funds
25 Most Recently Updated Funds
Top 10 Hedge Funds by AUM
Top 10 Performing Funds for Jun 2017
Top 10 YTD Return
Top 10 Compound Annual Return
Top 10 Funds 3 Year Return







 Hedge Fund News


Hedge Fund News

Breaking Hedge Fund News
Hedge Fund Blogs
Hedge Fund Press Releases
Subscribe to our RSS FEED
Submit a Story



Breaking News
SEC Announces Whistleblower Award of More...SEC Announces $2.5 Million Whistleblower AwardSEC Bars Lawyer Who Committed FraudPreqin: Investors In Asia Pacific Increase...Ex-Harvard Star Meyer Is Said to Cut Jobs as...ADP Shares Spike On Report That Hedge Fund...Harmony Hedge Fund Becomes First... 






Learn about Hedge Funds


Hedge Funds 101

What is a Hedge Fund
How do Hedge Funds Work
Types of Hedge Funds
Common Misconceptions
Benefits of Hedge Fund Strategies
Measure Risk vs. Return



Resources

Hedge Fund Jobs
Hedge Fund White Papers
Hedge Fund Manager Interviews
HedgeCoVest








Hedge Fund Service Providers

Top 10 Service Provider CategoriesTechnology VendorsConsultantsAccounting FirmsReal EstateAdministratorsAdd Your Company Broker-DealersAttorneys/LawyersResearchFinancial and Investment AdvisorsExecutive Search/RecruitmentView All Service ProvidersFeatured Service Provider



NRS
Oriana DeRose (NRS)
    29 Brooks Street 
    Lakeville, CT 06039
    Phone: 860-596-0955
            Website
 

Hedge Fund Conferences
About HedgeCo


About HedgeCo

About HedgeCo
Meet the Team
In the News
Careers with HedgeCo
Media Kit
Contact Us



The HedgeCo Network

HedgeCoVest
HedgeCo Networks



Contact Us


HedgeCo, LLC
                                            400 North Clematis StreetSuite #205West Palm Beach, FL 33401Phone: 1-561-835-8690Fax: 1-561-828-3181
                                        















Hedge Fund News From HedgeCo.Net






← Hedge fund contributions going mostly to GOP
More Than One Hedge Fund Hacked In Sophisticated Cybercrimewave →


Alternative Investment Manager Infinity Capital Partners Offers the Infinity Core Alternative Fund Through Vivaldi Asset Management

June 23, 2014 : Permanent Link 

As advisors increasingly seek to incorporate alternative investment strategies into their clients’ portfolios, one of the leaders in hedge fund of funds, Infinity Capital Partners, has partnered with Vivaldi Asset Management to offer a registered multi-strategy investment fund with a minimum investment of $25,000 that invests in leading hedge funds.
Infinity Core Alternative Fund (NASDAQ: ZVAMIX), a closed-end interval fund of funds, was launched on April 1, 2014 and has assets of $25 million. Vivaldi Asset Management LLC, a SEC Registered Investment Advisor (RIA) providing alternative investment solutions to independent RIAs and financial intermediaries, is the investment advisor. Infinity Capital Advisors LLC, a division of Infinity Capital Partners, an independent, privately-owned fund of hedge funds manager, is the sub-advisor. The fund is available to accredited investors with assets outside of their primary residence of $1 million or more or annual income of at least $200,000. Advisors can purchase the fund through a number of platforms including Schwab, Fidelity, TD Ameritrade, Pershing, JP Morgan and Millennium Trust.
“The fund allows advisors to allocate to leading hedge funds at a smaller minimum of $25,000 than most hedge funds offer,” said Michael Peck, President and Co-Chief Investment Officer of Vivaldi Asset Management, the fund’s advisor. “We chose to partner with Infinity Capital Partners to sub-advise the fund because they have a track record of successfully managing a multi-strategy fund of funds since 2004.”
“Our experience and deep relationships give us access to a diversified roster of leading hedge fund managers,” said Jeff Vale, Chief Investment Officer of Infinity Capital Partners. “We only work with blue chip, institutional quality managers. Their typical minimums of $5 million or more are outside the reach of many investors.”
Infinity’s Chief Investment Officer Jeff Vale answered a few questions about the Infinity Core Alternatives Fund and its investment process:
Q. How do you select the multi-strategy hedge fund managers for your portfolio?
A. We screen the universe of roughly 8,000 to 10,000 hedge funds for managers that employ a multi-strategy approach, a minimum of a 10-year operating history and $5 billion in assets under management. That narrows the universe to roughly 50-75 funds that meet these criteria. The one constant of our selected managers is their relentless focus on risk management. We seek to find the best risk-managed hedge fund managers with long histories of delivering high Sharpe Ratio returns or the highest returns for the risks taken. We perform roughly two years of due diligence before making an initial investment with a manager.
Q. What is your objective with the fund?
A. We seek to consistently maximize returns relative to risk. The investment objective of the fund is to seek long-term capital growth. The fund invests primarily in other hedge funds that invest or trade in a wide range of securities, and, to a lesser extent, other property and currency interests. The underlying managers have exposure to a broad range of strategies across a wide range of security types and regions. Primary strategies include long/short equity, distressed securities, event driven, quantitative equity and securities arbitrage.
Q. Who should consider this fund?
A. The fund is appropriate for accredited investors who are seeking an alternative investment with low correlation to traditional equity and fixed income asset classes. The fund offers diversified exposure within the alternative asset class and is a true complement to liquid alternative investments. The fund may also be appropriate for an investor seeking attractive returns and downside protection.
Q. Do you move assets around between managers or make tactical allocation decisions?
A. No. We push down the tactical allocation decisions to the multi-strategy hedge fund managers with whom we invest. We neither use hedge overlays nor try to outsmart the managers we have hired. All of our hedge fund managers are global with many employees, significant resources on the ground and opportunity sets that are broad and well-researched.
Q. How do you determine how much is allocated to each manager?
A. We strive to manage a balanced portfolio. In practice, the weights vary. We manage against capacity as some managers may be hard or soft closed. We believe in a concentrated approach with a portfolio of 9 to 12 managers although we do not want any one manager to represent more than 20% of the portfolio. We rebalance the portfolio as needed; however, we do not actively trade the portfolio, use leverage or employ hedge overlays.
Q. How do you monitor the selected hedge fund managers?
A. We communicate regularly with the managers to gain insight into portfolio opportunities and their risk management process. We have longstanding relationships with each manager including senior management, portfolio managers, research analysts and their investor relations professionals. They recognize we are generally long term investors, have committed capital and they know and trust us.
Q. Why did you choose to offer a registered closed-end investment fund instead of a liquid alternative mutual fund?
A. Daily liquidity and the overall constraints of a mutual fund limit the spectrum and opportunity set of hedge fund strategies. Some of the most attractive and non-correlated strategies cannot be executed in a daily liquid fund structure. Our structure and committed capital enables our selected multi-strategy managers to seek out the most opportunistic strategies and deploy capital based on risk and not necessarily be constrained by the fund’s structure.
The fund offers quarterly liquidity; this means that advisors need to commit only those assets that can remain invested and that their clients will not need access to in the short term.
Q. What are the fees on the fund?
A. The management fee is 1.25% and other expenses are 0.46%; however, fees and expenses are capped at 1.50% or 150 basis points*. The advisor, at their option, may also charge a maximum sales charge of 3%. The underlying fund expenses are 4%. We believe alpha is expensive and we are willing to pay for that; however, beta is cheap. The structure allows us to bring traditional fund of hedge funds to a broader audience with a low fee structure.
About Infinity Capital Partners, LLC
Based in Atlanta, Georgia, Infinity Capital Partners is an independent, privately owned alternative investment manager. Infinity’s primary goal is to consistently maximize returns relative to risk. Founded in 2002, Infinity is owned and managed by its principal partners. Infinity’s investors include high net worth individuals, family offices, wealth management firms, and institutional investors. The firm’s partners and professionals have significant industry experience and have amassed a track record of success managing alternative investment partnerships. For more information, visit www.infinityfunds.com.
About Vivaldi Asset Management, LLC
Based in Chicago, Vivaldi Asset Management is a SEC Registered Investment Advisor (RIA) providing alternative investment solutions to independent RIAs and financial intermediaries. For over 15 years, Vivaldi’s principals have offered both 40-Act and private funds to accommodate RIAs looking to scale their alternative investment exposure or secure a truly customized solution. For more information, visit www.vivaldicap.com.


 

						This entry was posted in Press Releases, User Contributed News. Bookmark the permalink.											


← Hedge fund contributions going mostly to GOP
More Than One Hedge Fund Hacked In Sophisticated Cybercrimewave →



Leave a Reply Cancel replyYou must be logged in to post a comment. 
















 
/>





Categories

Activist Funds (90)

Asian Hedge Funds (5)

Closing Hedge Funds (28)

Developing Stories (260)

Events (61)

Fund of Funds (7)

Greece (1)

hedge fund client alert (4)

Hedge Fund Conferences (12)

Hedge Fund Fraud (359)

Hedge Fund Launches (250)

Hedge Fund Performance (80)

Hedge Fund Regulation (220)

hedge fund rulings (58)

Hedge Fund Strategies (301)

Hedge Fund Technology (41)

hedge fund whitepaper (30)

hedge-fund-research (652)

HedgeCo Networks Press Releases (774)

HedgeCo News (8,007)

HedgeCoVest News (783)

Insider Trading (81)

live-blogging (3)

Offshore funds (25)

Onshore funds (12)

Opinion (70)

People Moves (197)

Philanthropy (58)

politics (14)

Press Releases (459)

Private Equity (46)

Read Compete Article (1)

seeding (4)

Sports (2)

startups (5)

Story Ideas (5)

Success Stories (86)

Syndicated (16,323)

tech (2)

Technology (13)

UCITS (1)

Uncategorized (318)

User Contributed News (130)

women in hedge funds (16)





Recent Posts

SEC Announces Whistleblower Award of More Than $1.7 Million  Preqin: Investors In Asia Pacific Increase Hedge Fund Allocations  Ex-Harvard Star Meyer Is Said to Cut Jobs as Firm Bleeds Assets  ADP Shares Spike On Report That Hedge Fund Manager Bill Ackman Is Building A Stake   



















 
 





Investors

Conferences
Hedge Fund Search
Hedge Fund Rankings
Breaking News



Hedge Fund Managers

Manager Benefits
Conferences
Service Providers



My Account

My Home / Dashboard
My Profile
Account Settings
My Messages



Information / Support

Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Industry Overview
Hedge Fund FAQs
Hedge Fund Glossary






© 2017 HedgeCo.Net

About Us
Contact Us
Jobs
Terms and Conditions


HedgeCo Privacy
Advertise



















Fund Finder




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








						 Account Access








Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          








											Mutual Funds
										



















  
  
  










0 Funds found





Filters








Quick sets















ASSET CLASS








Equity








Back








All Equity






Domestic Large





Domestic Small/Medium





Domestic All Cap





International Large





International Small/Medium





International All Cap








Fixed Income








Back








All Fixed Income






Short Duration/Government






Single Sector






Municipal/Tax-Free






Multi-Sector









Alternatives






Commodities






Real Estate / Infrastructure






Portfolio Solutions








Back








All Portfolio Solutions






Target Date









Money Markets








Back








All Money Markets






Taxable






Tax Free











SHARE CLASS








For all asset classes








Back









A





C





Institutional





Institutional Retirement





Retirement





Service







Admin





Separate Account





R6





Advisor





Preferred








For money market funds








Back









Institutional





Select





Preferred





Capital





Admin





Premier







Service





Resource





CMS





C





A





R6










MORNINGSTAR RATINGS










4 & 5 Stars






3, 4 & 5 Stars






All Rated








Morningstar Categories








Back








Morningstar Categories







Allocation--30pct to 50pct Equity





Allocation--85pct+ Equity





Bank Loan





Commodities Broad Basket





Corporate Bond





Diversified Emerging Mkts





Emerging Markets Bond





Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond





Energy Limited Partnership





Foreign Large Blend





Foreign Large Growth





Foreign Large Value





Foreign Small/Mid Value





Global Real Estate







High Yield Bond





High Yield Muni





Inflation-Protected Bond





Infrastructure





Intermediate Government





Intermediate-Term Bond





Large Blend





Large Growth





Large Value





Long-Short Credit





Long-Short Equity





Managed Futures





Mid-Cap Blend





Mid-Cap Growth







Mid-Cap Value





Multialternative





Muni National Interm





Muni National Short





Nontraditional Bond





Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk





Real Estate





Short Government





Short-Term Bond





Small Blend





Small Growth





Small Value





Tactical Allocation





Target-Date 2020







Target-Date 2025





Target-Date 2030





Target-Date 2035





Target-Date 2040





Target-Date 2045





Target-Date 2050





Target-Date 2055





Technology





Ultrashort Bond





World Allocation





World Bond





World Large Stock











LIPPER RANKING










Top 25%






Top 50%






All Lipper








Lipper Categories








Back








Equity Categories











Emerging Markets Funds





Equity Income Funds





Global Multi-Cap Core





International Equity Income Funds





International Multi-Cap Core





International Small/Mid-Cap Core





Large-Cap Core Funds





Large-Cap Growth Funds





Large-Cap Value Funds





Mid-Cap Core Funds







Mid-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Core Funds





Multi-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Value Funds





Pacific Ex Japan Funds





Science & Technology Funds





Small-Cap Core Funds





Small-Cap Growth Funds





Small-Cap Value Funds










Fixed Income Categories











Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Core Bond Funds





Core Plus Bond Funds





Corporate Debt Funds BBB-Rated





Emerging Markets Local Currency Debt Fds





Emerging Mrkts Hard Currency Debt Funds





General U.S. Government Funds





Global Income Funds





High Yield Funds





High Yield Municipal Debt Funds







Inflation Protected Bond Funds





Intermediate Municipal Debt Funds





Intermediate U.S. Government Funds





Loan Participation Funds





Short Municipal Debt Funds





Short U.S. Government Funds





Short-Intmdt Investment Grade Debt Funds





U.S. Mortgage Funds





Ultra-Short Obligations Funds










Alternatives Categories











Absolute Return Funds





Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Alternative Long/Short Equity Funds







Alternative Managed Futures Funds





Alternative Multi-Strategy Funds





Flexible Portfolio Funds










Commodities Categories











Commodities General Funds


















Real Estate / Infrastructure











Energy MLP Funds





Global Infrastructure Funds





Global Real Estate Funds







International Real Estate Funds





Real Estate Funds










Portfolio Solutions Categories











Flexible Portfolio Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2020 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2025 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2030 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2035 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2040 Funds







Mixed-Asset Target 2045 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2050 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2055+ Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Agg Gro Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Growth Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Moderate Funds










Daily Liquid Alternatives Categories











Alternative Other Funds


























Quick sets








Featured Funds






Star Performers






Recently Viewed Funds













Reset




Save




DEFAULT SELECTIONS








Loading Fund Finder data...


No results match your criteria. Try broadening your search. Reset filters. Or go back to previous results.


Error loading page.  Please accept our apologies.




Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Fund Facts










New fund































                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Products
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Prospectuses
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               





















































Hedge Fund Equity Long-Short Strategy | Hedge Fund Information 

































































Welcome to BarclayHedge

#1 Alternative Investment Resource

					See hedge fund rankings, indices, exclusive third party research, and more when you join for FREE.
					

QUICK SIGN UP 

					Instant access after activation.
					






Not a member yet? Sign up!
Email:

First Name:















X
						Member Login
						
Email:

Password:



I agree to Terms of Use






Lost your password?








 

Log In    Register


 









Contact us: 	+1 (641) 472-3456 









Home



Products


BarclayHedge Databases

Global Hedge Fund
Hedge Fund 
Fund of Hedge Funds 
Single Manager Hedge Fund 
Contact/Marketing 
Managed Futures (CTA) 
Currency Traders 
Graveyard
Enhanced Databases
UCITS Hedge Fund



Reports


Hedge Fund Due Diligence
CTA Flash Report

Indices Report



More Services


BarclayHedge TV
Swiss Analytics


MAP Software












Research


Library

Fund Administration
Flow Report Research Studies
Hedge Fund Due Diligence
Hedge Fund Risk Assessment
Educational Articles
Manager Roundtables
Manager Profiles
Third-Party Research
Proprietary Studies
Commodity Market Analysis
Fund Marketing



Fund Rankings


Hedge Fund Monthly Rankings
Hedge Fund Yearly Rankings

CTA Monthly Rankings
CTA Yearly Rankings
BMFR Rankings

Indices

Hedge Fund
CTA (Managed Futures) 



Assets Under Management

Combined AUM for HFs & CTAs
Only Hedge Funds
Only CTAs
 
 

Asset Flows

Asset Flow by Strategy 

More

FREE FUND SEARCH
Awards
Press Releases
New Fund Launches
Free Newsletter
Hedge Fund Widget
Events and Conferences
Industry Definitions





Company




Advertising
About Us
Support
Jobs
Become an Affiliate
Press Releases
Contact Us





Managers


Manager's Corner

Contributing Managers, please login below. 
						Not yet registered?  LIST YOUR FUND

User Id




Password







Regular users log in  
						HERE





Popular


Most Popular Pages

Hedge Fund Rankings 
Hedge Fund Indices 
Top Traders Podcasts 
Hedge Fund Database 
Free Database Search 
New Fund Launches 
  Top Hedge Fund Holdings 
BarclayHedge Awards 
LIST YOUR FUND 








































User ID/Email Address:
Password:
I Agree to Terms of Use


Forgot yourpassword?Click Here  
New User?Free MemberRegistration  




Register for free togain access to the Barclay hedge fund and CTA database,rankings, research reports, and much more...























Follow Us on Twitter











Search Our Databases Free!
Library
Flow Reports
Roundtables
Manager Profiles
3rd Party Research
Fund Administration
Due Diligence
Risk Assessment
Proprietary Studies
Commodity Analysis
Press Releases
NY Hedge Funds
UK Hedge Funds
DataFinder Instructions
Fund Marketing
BarclayHedge Awards NEW
Monthly HF Performance
Monthly CTA Performance
Yearly HF Performance
Yearly CTA Performance
BMFR Awards
Pinnacle Awards
Americas Awards

Assets Under Mgmt.
Hedge Funds
CTA
BMFR Rankings
Fund Rankings
Hedge Fund Rankings
CTA Rankings
Yearly Rankings

Asset Flows
Indices
Hedge Funds
CTAs
Free Newsletter
Hedge Fund Widget
Sponsored Events
Participating Events

Educational Articles 
Industry Definitions
New Fund Launches 
Investment Conferences












>  Hedge Fund Articles Home



 Hedge Fund Strategy - Equity Long-Short
An  equity long-short strategy is an investing strategy, used primarily by hedge  funds, that involves taking long positions in stocks that are expected to  increase in value and short positions in stocks that are expected to decrease  in value.
You  may know that taking a long position in a stock simply means buying it: If the  stock increases in value, you will make money. On the other hand, taking a  short position in a stock means borrowing a stock you don’t own (usually from  your broker), selling it, then hoping it declines in value, at which time you  can buy it back at a lower price than you paid for it and return the borrowed  shares.
Hedge  funds using equity long-short strategies simply do this on a grander scale. At  its most basic level, an equity long-short strategy consists of buying an  undervalued stock and shorting an overvalued stock. Ideally, the long position  will increase in value, and the short position will decline in value. If this  happens, and the positions are of equal size, the hedge fund will benefit. That  said, the strategy will work even if the long position declines in value, provided  that the long position outperforms the short position. Thus, the goal of any  equity long-short strategy is to minimize exposure to the market in general,  and profit from a change in the difference, or spread, between two stocks. 
That  may sound complicated, so let’s look at a hypothetical example. Let’s say a  hedge fund takes a $1 million long position in Pfizer and a $1 million short  position in Wyeth, both large pharmaceutical companies. With these positions,  any event that causes all pharmaceutical stocks to fall will lead to a loss on  the Pfizer position and a profit on the Wyeth position. Similarly, an event  that causes both stocks to rise will have little effect, since the positions  balance each other out. So, the market risk is minimal. Why, then, would a  portfolio manager take such a position? Because he or she thinks Pfizer will  perform better than Wyeth. 
Equity  long-short strategies such as the one described, which hold equal dollar  amounts of long and short positions, are called market neutral strategies. But  not all equity long-short strategies are market neutral. Some hedge fund  managers will maintain a long bias, as is the case with so-called “130/30”  strategies. With these strategies, hedge funds have 130% exposure to long  positions and 30% exposure to short positions. Other structures are also used,  such as 120% long and 20% short. (Few hedge funds have a long-term short bias,  since the equity markets tend to move up over time.) 
Equity  long-short managers can also be distinguished by the geographic market in which  they invest, the sector in which they invest (financial, health care or  technology, for example) or their investment style (value or quantitative, for  example). Buying and selling two related stocks—for example, two stocks in the  same region or industry—is called a “paired trade” model. It may limit risk to  a specific subset of the market instead of the market in general.
Equity  long-short strategies have been used by sophisticated investors, such as  institutions, for years. They became increasingly popular among individual  investors as traditional strategies struggled in the most recent bear market,  highlighting the need for investors to consider expanding their portfolios into  innovative financial solutions.
   
  Equity  long-short strategies are not without risks. These strategies have all the  generic hedge fund risks: For example, hedge funds are typically not as liquid  as mutual funds, meaning it is more difficult to sell shares; the strategies  they use could lead to significant losses; and they can have high fees.  Additionally, equity long-short strategies have some unique risks. The main one  is that the portfolio manager must correctly predict the relative performance  of two stocks, which can be difficult. Another risk results from what is  referred to in the industry as “beta mismatch.” While this is more complicated  that we can explain in detail here, essentially, it means that 
when  the stock market declines sharply, long positions could lose more than short  positions. 
In  summary, equity long-short strategies may help increase returns in difficult  market environments, but also involve some risk. As a result, investors  considering these strategies may want to ensure that their hedge funds follow  strict rules to evaluate market risks and find good investment opportunities. 

Get comprehensive and up-to-date information on
6100 + Hedge Funds, Funds of Funds, and CTAs in the Barclay Global Hedge Fund Database.





	FREE Live Data on 
	6666 
	Hedge Funds & CTAs 
		
		 
		







 More articles:

What is a hedge fund?
Fund of Hedge Funds - Strategy Description
Convertible Arbitrage - Strategy Description
Emerging Markets - Strategy Description
Investing in Distressed Securities
Understanding Event-Driven Investing
Understanding Fixed-Income Arbitrage
Understanding Merger Arbitrage
Understanding Relative-Value Arbitrage

 

back to top


Home |
Privacy |
About Us |
Blog |
Articles |
Terms of Use | 
Advertise | 
Contact Us | 
Follow Us  | 
© 

BarclayHedge, Ltd 























Exchange-Traded Funds, ETF List | Direxion




























 

















BRZU Daily MSCI Brazil Bull 3X SharesCHAD Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bear 1X SharesCHAU Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bull 2X SharesCLAW Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bear 3X SharesCOM Direxion Auspice Broad Commodity Strategy ETFCURE Daily Healthcare Bull 3X SharesCWEB Daily CSI China Internet Index Bull 2X SharesDFEN Daily Aerospace & Defense Bull 3X SharesDPK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bear 3X SharesDPST Daily Regional Banks Bull 3X SharesDRIP Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bear 3X SharesDRN Daily MSCI Real Estate Bull 3X SharesDRV Daily MSCI Real Estate Bear 3X SharesDULL Daily Silver Miners Index Bear 2X SharesDUSL Daily Industrials Bull 3X SharesDUST Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesDXCBX Direxion Indexed CVT Strategy FundDXCIX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – Inst.DXCTX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – ADXELX Monthly Emerging Markets Bull 2X FundDXHLX Monthly China Bull 2X FundDXHYX Monthly High Yield Bull 1.2X FundDXKLX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 2X FundDXKSX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 2X FundDXLTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bull 1.35X FundDXMAX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – ADXMCX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – CDXMIX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – Inst.DXNLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 1.25X FundDXNSX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bear 1.25X FundDXQLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 2X FundDXRLX Monthly Small Cap Bull 2X FundDXRSX Monthly Small Cap Bear 2X FundDXSCX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – CDXSLX Monthly S&P 500 Bull 2X FundDXSSX Monthly S&P 500 Bear 2X FundDXSTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bear 1.35X FundDZK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bull 3X SharesEDC Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bull 3X SharesEDZ Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bear 3X SharesERX Daily Energy Bull 3X SharesERY Daily Energy Bear 3X SharesERYY Daily Energy Bear 1X SharesEUFL Daily MSCI European Financials Bull 2X SharesEUFS Daily MSCI European Financials Bear 1X SharesEURL Daily FTSE Europe Bull 3X SharesEUXL Daily EURO STOXX 50 Bull 3X SharesFAS Daily Financial Bull 3X SharesFAZ Daily Financial Bear 3X SharesFAZZ Daily Financial Bear 1X SharesGASL Daily Natural Gas Related Bull 3X SharesGASX Daily Natural Gas Related Bear 3X SharesGUSH Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bull 3X SharesHAKK Daily Cyber Security & IT Bull 2X SharesHCYAX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – AHCYCX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – CHCYIX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – Inst.HYDD Daily High Yield Bear 2X SharesIBLN Direxion iBillionaire Index ETFINDL Daily MSCI India Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesJPNL Daily MSCI Japan Bull 3X SharesKNOW Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment SharesKORU Daily MSCI South Korea Bull 3X SharesLABD Daily S&P Biotech Bear 3X SharesLABS Daily S&P Biotech Bear 1X SharesLABU Daily S&P Biotech Bull 3X SharesLBJ Daily Latin America Bull 3X SharesLLSC Daily Small Cap Bull 1.25X SharesLLSP Daily S&P 500 Bull 1.25X SharesMELT Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 1X SharesMEXX Daily MSCI Mexico Bull 3X SharesMIDU Daily Mid Cap Bull 3X SharesMIDZ Daily Mid Cap Bear 3X SharesNAIL Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bull 3X SharesNUGT Daily Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesPEMVX Evolution Managed FundsQQQE Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index SharesRETL Daily Retail Bull 3X SharesRUSL Daily Russia Bull 3X SharesRUSS Daily Russia Bear 3X SharesSAGG Daily Total Bond Market Bear 1X SharesSHNY Daily Silver Miners Index Bull 2X SharesSICK Daily Healthcare Bear 3X SharesSMLL Daily Small Cap Bull 2X SharesSOXL Daily Semiconductor Bull 3X SharesSOXS Daily Semiconductor Bear 3X SharesSPDN Daily S&P 500 Bear 1X SharesSPLZ Daily Consumer Staples Bear 1X SharesSPUU Daily S&P 500 Bull 2X SharesSPXL Daily S&P 500 Bull 3X SharesSPXS Daily S&P 500 Bear 3X SharesTECL Daily Technology Bull 3X SharesTECS Daily Technology Bear 3X SharesTECZ Daily Technology Bear 1X SharesTMF Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTMV Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTNA Daily Small Cap Bull 3X SharesTPOR Daily Transportation Bull 3X SharesTYBS Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYD Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTYNS Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYO Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTZA Daily Small Cap Bear 3X SharesUTLZ Daily Utilities Bear 1X SharesUTSL Daily Utilities Bull 3X SharesWDRW Daily Regional Banks Bear 3X SharesYANG Daily FTSE China Bear 3X SharesYINN Daily FTSE China Bull 3X SharesZMLP Direxion Zacks MLP High Income Index Shares 









 




    Exchange-Traded Funds  





+ Share 



 
 









 The performance data quoted represents past performance. Past performance does not guarantee future results. The investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate. An investor’s shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost; current performance may be lower or higher than the performance quoted. Returns for performance for one year and under are cumulative, not annualized. Short term performance, in particular, is not a good indication of the fund’s future performance, and an investment should not be made based solely on returns. For additional information, see the fund(s) prospectus.
Each Direxion Fund share price is calculated as of the close of regular trading, usually as of 4:00 p.m. Eastern Time, each day the New York Stock Exchange is open for business. Each fund seeks to meet its investment objective relative to the value of the target index or benchmark as of 4:00 p.m.
Shares of Direxion Shares are bought and sold at market price (not NAV) and are not individually redeemed from the Fund. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns. Market Price returns are based upon the midpoint of the bid/ask spread at 4:00 PM Eastern time (when NAV is normally determined), and do not represent the returns you would receive if you traded shares at other times. Fund returns assume that dividends and capital gains distributions have been reinvested in the Fund at NAV. Some performance results reflect expense subsidies and waivers in effect during certain periods shown. Absent these waivers, results would have been less favorable.
After-Tax and After-Tax, Post Sales Returns
Tax-adjusted returns and tax cost ratio are estimates of the impact taxes have had on a fund. We assume the highest tax rate in calculating these figures. These returns follow the SEC guidelines for calculating returns before sale of shares. Tax-adjusted returns show a fund’s annualized after tax total return for the one, three and five year periods, excluding any capital-gains effects that would result from selling the fund at the end of the period. To determine this figure, all income and short-term capital gains distributions are taxed at the maximum federal rate at the time of distribution. Long-term capital gains are taxed at a 15% rate. The after tax portion is then assumed to be reinvested in the fund. State and local taxes are not included in our calculations. For more information, please consult your tax consultant.
Distribution Dates

Payable and Ex-Date – With regard to mutual funds, this is the day on which declared distributions (dividends or capital gains) are deducted from the fund’s assets before it calculates its net asset value (NAV). The NAV per share will drop by the amount of the distribution per share.
Record Date – Date by which a shareholder must officially own shares in order to be entitled to a dividend.

Types of Distributions

Income Dividend – A portion of a company’s profit paid to common and preferred shareholders.
Long Term Capital Gains – Profits distributed to shareholders resulting from the sale of securities held in the fund’s portfolio for more than one year.
Short Term Capital Gains – Profits distributed to shareholders resulting from the sale of securities held in the fund’s portfolio for less than one year


 











Related Reading

Knowledge
Related education, articles, and insights.



  ETF Market Pricing    


ETF market prices are the prices at which investors buy or sell shares of an ETF in the secondary market. While ETFs are designed to trade in line with their intraday values, during times of significant market volatility an ETF’s market price may vary more widely from its intraday value.


  ETF Liquidity – Four Rules to Consider    


Liquidity, transparency, real-time trading, and relatively low management fees are the reason why ETFs are becoming more and more popular. Learn about the four key characteristics that investors should better understand in order to trade them properly.
 More articles like this
 
















ETF & Mutual Fund Investment Tools | Direxion



























 


















BRZU Daily MSCI Brazil Bull 3X SharesCHAD Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bear 1X SharesCHAU Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bull 2X SharesCLAW Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bear 3X SharesCOM Direxion Auspice Broad Commodity Strategy ETFCURE Daily Healthcare Bull 3X SharesCWEB Daily CSI China Internet Index Bull 2X SharesDFEN Daily Aerospace & Defense Bull 3X SharesDPK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bear 3X SharesDPST Daily Regional Banks Bull 3X SharesDRIP Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bear 3X SharesDRN Daily MSCI Real Estate Bull 3X SharesDRV Daily MSCI Real Estate Bear 3X SharesDULL Daily Silver Miners Index Bear 2X SharesDUSL Daily Industrials Bull 3X SharesDUST Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesDXCBX Direxion Indexed CVT Strategy FundDXCIX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – Inst.DXCTX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – ADXELX Monthly Emerging Markets Bull 2X FundDXHLX Monthly China Bull 2X FundDXHYX Monthly High Yield Bull 1.2X FundDXKLX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 2X FundDXKSX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 2X FundDXLTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bull 1.35X FundDXMAX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – ADXMCX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – CDXMIX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – Inst.DXNLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 1.25X FundDXNSX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bear 1.25X FundDXQLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 2X FundDXRLX Monthly Small Cap Bull 2X FundDXRSX Monthly Small Cap Bear 2X FundDXSCX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – CDXSLX Monthly S&P 500 Bull 2X FundDXSSX Monthly S&P 500 Bear 2X FundDXSTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bear 1.35X FundDZK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bull 3X SharesEDC Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bull 3X SharesEDZ Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bear 3X SharesERX Daily Energy Bull 3X SharesERY Daily Energy Bear 3X SharesERYY Daily Energy Bear 1X SharesEUFL Daily MSCI European Financials Bull 2X SharesEUFS Daily MSCI European Financials Bear 1X SharesEURL Daily FTSE Europe Bull 3X SharesEUXL Daily EURO STOXX 50 Bull 3X SharesFAS Daily Financial Bull 3X SharesFAZ Daily Financial Bear 3X SharesFAZZ Daily Financial Bear 1X SharesGASL Daily Natural Gas Related Bull 3X SharesGASX Daily Natural Gas Related Bear 3X SharesGUSH Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bull 3X SharesHAKK Daily Cyber Security & IT Bull 2X SharesHCYAX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – AHCYCX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – CHCYIX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – Inst.HYDD Daily High Yield Bear 2X SharesIBLN Direxion iBillionaire Index ETFINDL Daily MSCI India Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesJPNL Daily MSCI Japan Bull 3X SharesKNOW Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment SharesKORU Daily MSCI South Korea Bull 3X SharesLABD Daily S&P Biotech Bear 3X SharesLABS Daily S&P Biotech Bear 1X SharesLABU Daily S&P Biotech Bull 3X SharesLBJ Daily Latin America Bull 3X SharesLLSC Daily Small Cap Bull 1.25X SharesLLSP Daily S&P 500 Bull 1.25X SharesMELT Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 1X SharesMEXX Daily MSCI Mexico Bull 3X SharesMIDU Daily Mid Cap Bull 3X SharesMIDZ Daily Mid Cap Bear 3X SharesNAIL Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bull 3X SharesNUGT Daily Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesPEMVX Evolution Managed FundsQQQE Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index SharesRETL Daily Retail Bull 3X SharesRUSL Daily Russia Bull 3X SharesRUSS Daily Russia Bear 3X SharesSAGG Daily Total Bond Market Bear 1X SharesSHNY Daily Silver Miners Index Bull 2X SharesSICK Daily Healthcare Bear 3X SharesSMLL Daily Small Cap Bull 2X SharesSOXL Daily Semiconductor Bull 3X SharesSOXS Daily Semiconductor Bear 3X SharesSPDN Daily S&P 500 Bear 1X SharesSPLZ Daily Consumer Staples Bear 1X SharesSPUU Daily S&P 500 Bull 2X SharesSPXL Daily S&P 500 Bull 3X SharesSPXS Daily S&P 500 Bear 3X SharesTECL Daily Technology Bull 3X SharesTECS Daily Technology Bear 3X SharesTECZ Daily Technology Bear 1X SharesTMF Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTMV Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTNA Daily Small Cap Bull 3X SharesTPOR Daily Transportation Bull 3X SharesTYBS Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYD Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTYNS Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYO Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTZA Daily Small Cap Bear 3X SharesUTLZ Daily Utilities Bear 1X SharesUTSL Daily Utilities Bull 3X SharesWDRW Daily Regional Banks Bear 3X SharesYANG Daily FTSE China Bear 3X SharesYINN Daily FTSE China Bull 3X SharesZMLP Direxion Zacks MLP High Income Index Shares 










    Tools You Can Use  


Direxion provides a suite of tools that can be highly beneficial when implementing tactical investment strategies. These tools can be applied to strategies that are both specific and non-specific to Direxion.


Mutual Fund Tools


  Exposure Level Tools    


The following tools help determine a Monthly Leveraged Index Fund's estimated exposure level for the day on which it is purchased using data feeds which provide real time values. 
 

ETF Tools


  Premium/Discount Tool    


The Premium/Discount Tool illustrates the daily difference (premium or discount) between the market closing price and calculated net asset value per share of Direxion ETFs.
 











Billionaire’s Family Office Packages Strategies in Liquid Alts Fund              DailyAltsLiquid Alternatives | News, Data and AnalysisTwitterLinkedInFacebookGoogle+RSSHOMENEWSCompany NewsFund NewsIndustry NewsInvesting InsightsPeople NewsSurveys & RankingsCOMMENTARYRESEARCHVIDEOSDailyAlts VideosFUNDSAlternative BetaAlternative Fixed IncomeAlternative IncomeArbitrageCommoditiesLong/Short CommoditiesGlobal MacroHedged EquityCovered CallsHedged Equity – OtherLong/Short EquityLow Volatility EquityLiquid AlternativesManaged FuturesMarket NeutralMulti-StrategyOther13F ReplicationReal ReturnReal EstateRisk ParityTBDEVENTSRESOURCESPODCASTEDUCATION      Billionaire’s Family Office Packages Strategies in Liquid Alts FundBy DailyAlts Staff | April 14, 2015 Leave a CommentDavid Bonderman became a multi-billionaire buying and fixing up companies, and then created a family office to manage a portion of his personal fortune. That family office has grown into Wildcat Capital Management, and it now manages $1.3 billion for Mr. Bonderman and a small group of his friends and family. Now Wildcat is backing a new startup business, Infinity Q, that provides exposure to Bonderman’s Wildcat family office investment strategies under the structure of a liquid alternative mutual fund.Diversified AlphaThe Infinity Q Diversified Alpha Fund (IQDNX) is an absolute return strategy fund that launched on September 30, 2014. The fund seeks a combination of exposures to volatility, long/short equity, relative value, and global macro strategies, according to its prospectus.Its volatility strategy involves long and short exposure to a diversified basket of derivatives across the major asset classes: stocks, bonds, commodities, currencies, and interest rates.Its long/short equity strategy involves establishing long and short positions in stocks and stock-related securities, including equity options.Its relative value strategy involves simultaneously buying and short-selling highly correlated securities.Its global macro strategy involves long and short exposure across asset classes, with investment decisions made on the basis of the advisor’s global macroeconomic forecasts.This combination of exposures is intended to provide diversification benefits within the fund, dampening volatility and providing low correlation to broad-market stock and bond benchmarks.The fund is available in A (IQDAX) and I (IQDNX) shares, with respective net-expense ratios of 1.99% and 1.74%. The minimum initial investment for A shares is $1,000; while the minimum for I shares is $100,000.Family Offices and Liquid AltsLiquid alternatives are the fastest growing asset category of the mutual fund industry, and while Wildcat’s move from family office of the super-rich to the world of liquid alts is not new (see: Brad Balter on the Confluence of Hedge Funds and Liquid Alts), it is uncommon – at least to date. “Families recognize that over time it’s sometimes valuable to turn the services they created into a business,” said Bill Woodson, head of the North America family office group at Citigroup Inc.’s private bank, as quoted by Bloomberg. And since family offices often have teams evaluating and investing in alternative investments, it wouldn’t be unrealistic to see more of them port those skills over to a mutual fund.For Mr. Bonderman and his money managers, the move into liquid alts is a win-win proposition. Mr. Bonderman remains free to manage TPG Capital while Infinity Q is run by Wildcat employees. The employees are able to make more money for themselves, and for Mr. Bonderman, by offering retail investors exposure to the alternative strategies that have generated 15% annualized returns for the family office since August 2012. If Infinity Q can maintain that performance, then the move into liquid alts will be a win for investors, too.For more information, visit infinityqfunds.com. Related Links: Multi-Strategy ▪ Headline News ▪ Fund News▪ News WEBCAST: Geopolitical Hotspots and Their Impact on Markets WHITE PAPER: Game Theory Primer for Macro InvestorsFree NewsletterSign up and get all the news delivered directly to you. sign me up   RECENT ARTICLES Riding Investment Waves For Risk Averse Investors The Case for Global Multi-Assets Why Litman Gregory Created a Liquid Alternatives Fund Why “The Market” Is Not What You Think It Is Still Trending… TRENDING STORIESWhy Litman Gregory Created a Liquid Alternatives FundWhy “The Market” Is Not What You Think It IsThe Case for Global Multi-AssetsBillionaire’s Family Office Packages Strategies in Liquid Alts FundStill Trending… UPCOMING EVENTS  Sep  07 Total Alts 2017 September 7 - September 8     Oct  23 Inside Alternatives October 23 - October 24    View More… ABOUTADVERTISINGLEGAL INFOCONTACT USSITEMAP © Copyright 2017 Alternative Strategy Partners, LLC. All Rights Reserved. DailyAlts (and DailyAlts.com) is an information service provided by Alternative Strategy Partners, LLC. Information and data on this site is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or an invitation to buy or sell any securities. Please see the full Terms and Conditions for using this website located under the Legal Info link above.DailyAlts is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com.                      


ETF & Mutual Fund Educational Material | Direxion



























 

















BRZU Daily MSCI Brazil Bull 3X SharesCHAD Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bear 1X SharesCHAU Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bull 2X SharesCLAW Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bear 3X SharesCOM Direxion Auspice Broad Commodity Strategy ETFCURE Daily Healthcare Bull 3X SharesCWEB Daily CSI China Internet Index Bull 2X SharesDFEN Daily Aerospace & Defense Bull 3X SharesDPK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bear 3X SharesDPST Daily Regional Banks Bull 3X SharesDRIP Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bear 3X SharesDRN Daily MSCI Real Estate Bull 3X SharesDRV Daily MSCI Real Estate Bear 3X SharesDULL Daily Silver Miners Index Bear 2X SharesDUSL Daily Industrials Bull 3X SharesDUST Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesDXCBX Direxion Indexed CVT Strategy FundDXCIX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – Inst.DXCTX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – ADXELX Monthly Emerging Markets Bull 2X FundDXHLX Monthly China Bull 2X FundDXHYX Monthly High Yield Bull 1.2X FundDXKLX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 2X FundDXKSX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 2X FundDXLTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bull 1.35X FundDXMAX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – ADXMCX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – CDXMIX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – Inst.DXNLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 1.25X FundDXNSX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bear 1.25X FundDXQLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 2X FundDXRLX Monthly Small Cap Bull 2X FundDXRSX Monthly Small Cap Bear 2X FundDXSCX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – CDXSLX Monthly S&P 500 Bull 2X FundDXSSX Monthly S&P 500 Bear 2X FundDXSTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bear 1.35X FundDZK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bull 3X SharesEDC Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bull 3X SharesEDZ Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bear 3X SharesERX Daily Energy Bull 3X SharesERY Daily Energy Bear 3X SharesERYY Daily Energy Bear 1X SharesEUFL Daily MSCI European Financials Bull 2X SharesEUFS Daily MSCI European Financials Bear 1X SharesEURL Daily FTSE Europe Bull 3X SharesEUXL Daily EURO STOXX 50 Bull 3X SharesFAS Daily Financial Bull 3X SharesFAZ Daily Financial Bear 3X SharesFAZZ Daily Financial Bear 1X SharesGASL Daily Natural Gas Related Bull 3X SharesGASX Daily Natural Gas Related Bear 3X SharesGUSH Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bull 3X SharesHAKK Daily Cyber Security & IT Bull 2X SharesHCYAX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – AHCYCX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – CHCYIX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – Inst.HYDD Daily High Yield Bear 2X SharesIBLN Direxion iBillionaire Index ETFINDL Daily MSCI India Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesJPNL Daily MSCI Japan Bull 3X SharesKNOW Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment SharesKORU Daily MSCI South Korea Bull 3X SharesLABD Daily S&P Biotech Bear 3X SharesLABS Daily S&P Biotech Bear 1X SharesLABU Daily S&P Biotech Bull 3X SharesLBJ Daily Latin America Bull 3X SharesLLSC Daily Small Cap Bull 1.25X SharesLLSP Daily S&P 500 Bull 1.25X SharesMELT Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 1X SharesMEXX Daily MSCI Mexico Bull 3X SharesMIDU Daily Mid Cap Bull 3X SharesMIDZ Daily Mid Cap Bear 3X SharesNAIL Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bull 3X SharesNUGT Daily Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesPEMVX Evolution Managed FundsQQQE Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index SharesRETL Daily Retail Bull 3X SharesRUSL Daily Russia Bull 3X SharesRUSS Daily Russia Bear 3X SharesSAGG Daily Total Bond Market Bear 1X SharesSHNY Daily Silver Miners Index Bull 2X SharesSICK Daily Healthcare Bear 3X SharesSMLL Daily Small Cap Bull 2X SharesSOXL Daily Semiconductor Bull 3X SharesSOXS Daily Semiconductor Bear 3X SharesSPDN Daily S&P 500 Bear 1X SharesSPLZ Daily Consumer Staples Bear 1X SharesSPUU Daily S&P 500 Bull 2X SharesSPXL Daily S&P 500 Bull 3X SharesSPXS Daily S&P 500 Bear 3X SharesTECL Daily Technology Bull 3X SharesTECS Daily Technology Bear 3X SharesTECZ Daily Technology Bear 1X SharesTMF Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTMV Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTNA Daily Small Cap Bull 3X SharesTPOR Daily Transportation Bull 3X SharesTYBS Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYD Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTYNS Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYO Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTZA Daily Small Cap Bear 3X SharesUTLZ Daily Utilities Bear 1X SharesUTSL Daily Utilities Bull 3X SharesWDRW Daily Regional Banks Bear 3X SharesYANG Daily FTSE China Bear 3X SharesYINN Daily FTSE China Bull 3X SharesZMLP Direxion Zacks MLP High Income Index Shares 













    Education Overview  


Direxion provides access to a growing array of products that can complement your strategy and help you become more responsive to near-term market trends. Please refer to this library of educational material to help you better understand how our products may fit into your investment objectives.





Product Literature



 

 



        Direxion ETF Education    


The Direxion Leveraged ETF Online Education Center offers brochures, videos, and a self-paced online course to help you understand if leveraged ETFs are suitable for you. 
 

 



        Understanding Leveraged & Inverse ETFs Video Series    


ETFs resemble mutual funds in structure but can be traded throughout the day like stocks. Direxion offers leveraged ETFs -- daily trading tools that are designed to help increase exposure and stay agile in rapidly changing markets.
 

 



        Understanding KNOW    


Watch this video to discover your alternative to standard weighted-index investing in the S&P 1500, with KNOW, Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment Shares which provides investors with access to stocks that corporate officers, directors, and shareholders are accumulating.
 

 



        Understanding QQQE    


Watch this video to learn about QQQE, the Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index Shares allots the same weight, or importance, to each stock in the index. The result is a more diversified performance contribution from the individual companies, and sectors that are in the index.
 

 



        Understanding Leveraged Exchange-Traded Funds    


A detailed explanation as to how these funds operate, as well as a the composition, risks & benefits of leveraged ETFs.
 

 



        Volatility Matters    


How volatility levels of a fund’s benchmark index can impact the returns of leveraged ETFs for periods greater than a day. 


Read More Product Literature







Articles and Insights



 

 



        All time highs. Time to build an ark?    


Inverse ETFs can help protect against a squall.  U.S. stocks bumped up against all-time highs again this year. After hitting a new intraday high of 2,178 on August 1st, the S&P 500 was unable to hold onto the gains. Sector performances offer a glimpse of where we are in the market cycle. The top…
 

 



        ETF Market Pricing    


ETF market prices are the prices at which investors buy or sell shares of an ETF in the secondary market. While ETFs are designed to trade in line with their intraday values, during times of significant market volatility an ETF’s market price may vary more widely from its intraday value.
 

 



        ETF Liquidity – Four Rules to Consider    


Liquidity, transparency, real-time trading, and relatively low management fees are the reason why ETFs are becoming more and more popular. Learn about the four key characteristics that investors should better understand in order to trade them properly.
 

 



        Addressing The Top Misconceptions About Alternative Investments    


Alternative strategies have the potential to be a viable way for investors, whether institutional or retail, to reduce risk in their investment portfolios.
 

 



        Alternatives? Too Many, or Not Enough?    


The key to risk-adjusted returns and diversification is not the number of securities – it’s their correlation – or, really, non-correlation – to each other, that’s paramount.
 

 



        A Correlation Misconception    


Some clients confuse negative correlation with low (or non-) correlation. They mistakenly believe that returns for investments with low correlation move in opposite directions from each other.


Read More Articles and Insights






Tools




  Premium/Discount Tool    


The Premium/Discount Tool illustrates the daily difference (premium or discount) between the market closing price and calculated net asset value per share of Direxion ETFs.


  Exposure Level Tools    


The following tools help determine a Monthly Leveraged Index Fund's estimated exposure level for the day on which it is purchased using data feeds which provide real time values. 
















ETF & Mutual Fund Educational Material | Direxion



























 

















BRZU Daily MSCI Brazil Bull 3X SharesCHAD Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bear 1X SharesCHAU Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bull 2X SharesCLAW Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bear 3X SharesCOM Direxion Auspice Broad Commodity Strategy ETFCURE Daily Healthcare Bull 3X SharesCWEB Daily CSI China Internet Index Bull 2X SharesDFEN Daily Aerospace & Defense Bull 3X SharesDPK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bear 3X SharesDPST Daily Regional Banks Bull 3X SharesDRIP Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bear 3X SharesDRN Daily MSCI Real Estate Bull 3X SharesDRV Daily MSCI Real Estate Bear 3X SharesDULL Daily Silver Miners Index Bear 2X SharesDUSL Daily Industrials Bull 3X SharesDUST Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesDXCBX Direxion Indexed CVT Strategy FundDXCIX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – Inst.DXCTX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – ADXELX Monthly Emerging Markets Bull 2X FundDXHLX Monthly China Bull 2X FundDXHYX Monthly High Yield Bull 1.2X FundDXKLX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 2X FundDXKSX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 2X FundDXLTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bull 1.35X FundDXMAX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – ADXMCX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – CDXMIX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – Inst.DXNLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 1.25X FundDXNSX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bear 1.25X FundDXQLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 2X FundDXRLX Monthly Small Cap Bull 2X FundDXRSX Monthly Small Cap Bear 2X FundDXSCX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – CDXSLX Monthly S&P 500 Bull 2X FundDXSSX Monthly S&P 500 Bear 2X FundDXSTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bear 1.35X FundDZK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bull 3X SharesEDC Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bull 3X SharesEDZ Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bear 3X SharesERX Daily Energy Bull 3X SharesERY Daily Energy Bear 3X SharesERYY Daily Energy Bear 1X SharesEUFL Daily MSCI European Financials Bull 2X SharesEUFS Daily MSCI European Financials Bear 1X SharesEURL Daily FTSE Europe Bull 3X SharesEUXL Daily EURO STOXX 50 Bull 3X SharesFAS Daily Financial Bull 3X SharesFAZ Daily Financial Bear 3X SharesFAZZ Daily Financial Bear 1X SharesGASL Daily Natural Gas Related Bull 3X SharesGASX Daily Natural Gas Related Bear 3X SharesGUSH Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bull 3X SharesHAKK Daily Cyber Security & IT Bull 2X SharesHCYAX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – AHCYCX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – CHCYIX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – Inst.HYDD Daily High Yield Bear 2X SharesIBLN Direxion iBillionaire Index ETFINDL Daily MSCI India Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesJPNL Daily MSCI Japan Bull 3X SharesKNOW Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment SharesKORU Daily MSCI South Korea Bull 3X SharesLABD Daily S&P Biotech Bear 3X SharesLABS Daily S&P Biotech Bear 1X SharesLABU Daily S&P Biotech Bull 3X SharesLBJ Daily Latin America Bull 3X SharesLLSC Daily Small Cap Bull 1.25X SharesLLSP Daily S&P 500 Bull 1.25X SharesMELT Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 1X SharesMEXX Daily MSCI Mexico Bull 3X SharesMIDU Daily Mid Cap Bull 3X SharesMIDZ Daily Mid Cap Bear 3X SharesNAIL Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bull 3X SharesNUGT Daily Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesPEMVX Evolution Managed FundsQQQE Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index SharesRETL Daily Retail Bull 3X SharesRUSL Daily Russia Bull 3X SharesRUSS Daily Russia Bear 3X SharesSAGG Daily Total Bond Market Bear 1X SharesSHNY Daily Silver Miners Index Bull 2X SharesSICK Daily Healthcare Bear 3X SharesSMLL Daily Small Cap Bull 2X SharesSOXL Daily Semiconductor Bull 3X SharesSOXS Daily Semiconductor Bear 3X SharesSPDN Daily S&P 500 Bear 1X SharesSPLZ Daily Consumer Staples Bear 1X SharesSPUU Daily S&P 500 Bull 2X SharesSPXL Daily S&P 500 Bull 3X SharesSPXS Daily S&P 500 Bear 3X SharesTECL Daily Technology Bull 3X SharesTECS Daily Technology Bear 3X SharesTECZ Daily Technology Bear 1X SharesTMF Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTMV Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTNA Daily Small Cap Bull 3X SharesTPOR Daily Transportation Bull 3X SharesTYBS Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYD Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTYNS Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYO Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTZA Daily Small Cap Bear 3X SharesUTLZ Daily Utilities Bear 1X SharesUTSL Daily Utilities Bull 3X SharesWDRW Daily Regional Banks Bear 3X SharesYANG Daily FTSE China Bear 3X SharesYINN Daily FTSE China Bull 3X SharesZMLP Direxion Zacks MLP High Income Index Shares 













    Education Overview  


Direxion provides access to a growing array of products that can complement your strategy and help you become more responsive to near-term market trends. Please refer to this library of educational material to help you better understand how our products may fit into your investment objectives.





Product Literature



 

 



        Direxion ETF Education    


The Direxion Leveraged ETF Online Education Center offers brochures, videos, and a self-paced online course to help you understand if leveraged ETFs are suitable for you. 
 

 



        Understanding Leveraged & Inverse ETFs Video Series    


ETFs resemble mutual funds in structure but can be traded throughout the day like stocks. Direxion offers leveraged ETFs -- daily trading tools that are designed to help increase exposure and stay agile in rapidly changing markets.
 

 



        Understanding KNOW    


Watch this video to discover your alternative to standard weighted-index investing in the S&P 1500, with KNOW, Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment Shares which provides investors with access to stocks that corporate officers, directors, and shareholders are accumulating.
 

 



        Understanding QQQE    


Watch this video to learn about QQQE, the Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index Shares allots the same weight, or importance, to each stock in the index. The result is a more diversified performance contribution from the individual companies, and sectors that are in the index.
 

 



        Understanding Leveraged Exchange-Traded Funds    


A detailed explanation as to how these funds operate, as well as a the composition, risks & benefits of leveraged ETFs.
 

 



        Volatility Matters    


How volatility levels of a fund’s benchmark index can impact the returns of leveraged ETFs for periods greater than a day. 


Read More Product Literature







Articles and Insights



 

 



        All time highs. Time to build an ark?    


Inverse ETFs can help protect against a squall.  U.S. stocks bumped up against all-time highs again this year. After hitting a new intraday high of 2,178 on August 1st, the S&P 500 was unable to hold onto the gains. Sector performances offer a glimpse of where we are in the market cycle. The top…
 

 



        ETF Market Pricing    


ETF market prices are the prices at which investors buy or sell shares of an ETF in the secondary market. While ETFs are designed to trade in line with their intraday values, during times of significant market volatility an ETF’s market price may vary more widely from its intraday value.
 

 



        ETF Liquidity – Four Rules to Consider    


Liquidity, transparency, real-time trading, and relatively low management fees are the reason why ETFs are becoming more and more popular. Learn about the four key characteristics that investors should better understand in order to trade them properly.
 

 



        Addressing The Top Misconceptions About Alternative Investments    


Alternative strategies have the potential to be a viable way for investors, whether institutional or retail, to reduce risk in their investment portfolios.
 

 



        Alternatives? Too Many, or Not Enough?    


The key to risk-adjusted returns and diversification is not the number of securities – it’s their correlation – or, really, non-correlation – to each other, that’s paramount.
 

 



        A Correlation Misconception    


Some clients confuse negative correlation with low (or non-) correlation. They mistakenly believe that returns for investments with low correlation move in opposite directions from each other.


Read More Articles and Insights






Tools




  Premium/Discount Tool    


The Premium/Discount Tool illustrates the daily difference (premium or discount) between the market closing price and calculated net asset value per share of Direxion ETFs.


  Exposure Level Tools    


The following tools help determine a Monthly Leveraged Index Fund's estimated exposure level for the day on which it is purchased using data feeds which provide real time values. 
















ETF & Mutual Fund Investment Tools | Direxion



























 


















BRZU Daily MSCI Brazil Bull 3X SharesCHAD Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bear 1X SharesCHAU Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bull 2X SharesCLAW Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bear 3X SharesCOM Direxion Auspice Broad Commodity Strategy ETFCURE Daily Healthcare Bull 3X SharesCWEB Daily CSI China Internet Index Bull 2X SharesDFEN Daily Aerospace & Defense Bull 3X SharesDPK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bear 3X SharesDPST Daily Regional Banks Bull 3X SharesDRIP Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bear 3X SharesDRN Daily MSCI Real Estate Bull 3X SharesDRV Daily MSCI Real Estate Bear 3X SharesDULL Daily Silver Miners Index Bear 2X SharesDUSL Daily Industrials Bull 3X SharesDUST Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesDXCBX Direxion Indexed CVT Strategy FundDXCIX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – Inst.DXCTX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – ADXELX Monthly Emerging Markets Bull 2X FundDXHLX Monthly China Bull 2X FundDXHYX Monthly High Yield Bull 1.2X FundDXKLX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 2X FundDXKSX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 2X FundDXLTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bull 1.35X FundDXMAX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – ADXMCX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – CDXMIX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – Inst.DXNLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 1.25X FundDXNSX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bear 1.25X FundDXQLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 2X FundDXRLX Monthly Small Cap Bull 2X FundDXRSX Monthly Small Cap Bear 2X FundDXSCX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – CDXSLX Monthly S&P 500 Bull 2X FundDXSSX Monthly S&P 500 Bear 2X FundDXSTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bear 1.35X FundDZK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bull 3X SharesEDC Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bull 3X SharesEDZ Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bear 3X SharesERX Daily Energy Bull 3X SharesERY Daily Energy Bear 3X SharesERYY Daily Energy Bear 1X SharesEUFL Daily MSCI European Financials Bull 2X SharesEUFS Daily MSCI European Financials Bear 1X SharesEURL Daily FTSE Europe Bull 3X SharesEUXL Daily EURO STOXX 50 Bull 3X SharesFAS Daily Financial Bull 3X SharesFAZ Daily Financial Bear 3X SharesFAZZ Daily Financial Bear 1X SharesGASL Daily Natural Gas Related Bull 3X SharesGASX Daily Natural Gas Related Bear 3X SharesGUSH Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bull 3X SharesHAKK Daily Cyber Security & IT Bull 2X SharesHCYAX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – AHCYCX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – CHCYIX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – Inst.HYDD Daily High Yield Bear 2X SharesIBLN Direxion iBillionaire Index ETFINDL Daily MSCI India Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesJPNL Daily MSCI Japan Bull 3X SharesKNOW Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment SharesKORU Daily MSCI South Korea Bull 3X SharesLABD Daily S&P Biotech Bear 3X SharesLABS Daily S&P Biotech Bear 1X SharesLABU Daily S&P Biotech Bull 3X SharesLBJ Daily Latin America Bull 3X SharesLLSC Daily Small Cap Bull 1.25X SharesLLSP Daily S&P 500 Bull 1.25X SharesMELT Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 1X SharesMEXX Daily MSCI Mexico Bull 3X SharesMIDU Daily Mid Cap Bull 3X SharesMIDZ Daily Mid Cap Bear 3X SharesNAIL Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bull 3X SharesNUGT Daily Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesPEMVX Evolution Managed FundsQQQE Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index SharesRETL Daily Retail Bull 3X SharesRUSL Daily Russia Bull 3X SharesRUSS Daily Russia Bear 3X SharesSAGG Daily Total Bond Market Bear 1X SharesSHNY Daily Silver Miners Index Bull 2X SharesSICK Daily Healthcare Bear 3X SharesSMLL Daily Small Cap Bull 2X SharesSOXL Daily Semiconductor Bull 3X SharesSOXS Daily Semiconductor Bear 3X SharesSPDN Daily S&P 500 Bear 1X SharesSPLZ Daily Consumer Staples Bear 1X SharesSPUU Daily S&P 500 Bull 2X SharesSPXL Daily S&P 500 Bull 3X SharesSPXS Daily S&P 500 Bear 3X SharesTECL Daily Technology Bull 3X SharesTECS Daily Technology Bear 3X SharesTECZ Daily Technology Bear 1X SharesTMF Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTMV Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTNA Daily Small Cap Bull 3X SharesTPOR Daily Transportation Bull 3X SharesTYBS Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYD Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTYNS Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYO Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTZA Daily Small Cap Bear 3X SharesUTLZ Daily Utilities Bear 1X SharesUTSL Daily Utilities Bull 3X SharesWDRW Daily Regional Banks Bear 3X SharesYANG Daily FTSE China Bear 3X SharesYINN Daily FTSE China Bull 3X SharesZMLP Direxion Zacks MLP High Income Index Shares 










    Tools You Can Use  


Direxion provides a suite of tools that can be highly beneficial when implementing tactical investment strategies. These tools can be applied to strategies that are both specific and non-specific to Direxion.


Mutual Fund Tools


  Exposure Level Tools    


The following tools help determine a Monthly Leveraged Index Fund's estimated exposure level for the day on which it is purchased using data feeds which provide real time values. 
 

ETF Tools


  Premium/Discount Tool    


The Premium/Discount Tool illustrates the daily difference (premium or discount) between the market closing price and calculated net asset value per share of Direxion ETFs.
 














Exchange-Traded Funds, ETF List | Direxion




























 

















BRZU Daily MSCI Brazil Bull 3X SharesCHAD Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bear 1X SharesCHAU Daily CSI 300 China A Share Bull 2X SharesCLAW Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bear 3X SharesCOM Direxion Auspice Broad Commodity Strategy ETFCURE Daily Healthcare Bull 3X SharesCWEB Daily CSI China Internet Index Bull 2X SharesDFEN Daily Aerospace & Defense Bull 3X SharesDPK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bear 3X SharesDPST Daily Regional Banks Bull 3X SharesDRIP Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bear 3X SharesDRN Daily MSCI Real Estate Bull 3X SharesDRV Daily MSCI Real Estate Bear 3X SharesDULL Daily Silver Miners Index Bear 2X SharesDUSL Daily Industrials Bull 3X SharesDUST Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesDXCBX Direxion Indexed CVT Strategy FundDXCIX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – Inst.DXCTX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – ADXELX Monthly Emerging Markets Bull 2X FundDXHLX Monthly China Bull 2X FundDXHYX Monthly High Yield Bull 1.2X FundDXKLX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 2X FundDXKSX Monthly 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 2X FundDXLTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bull 1.35X FundDXMAX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – ADXMCX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – CDXMIX Direxion Indexed Managed Futures Strategy Fund – Inst.DXNLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 1.25X FundDXNSX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bear 1.25X FundDXQLX Monthly NASDAQ-100 Bull 2X FundDXRLX Monthly Small Cap Bull 2X FundDXRSX Monthly Small Cap Bear 2X FundDXSCX Direxion Indexed Commodity Strategy Fund – CDXSLX Monthly S&P 500 Bull 2X FundDXSSX Monthly S&P 500 Bear 2X FundDXSTX Monthly 25+ Year Treasury Bear 1.35X FundDZK Daily MSCI Developed Markets Bull 3X SharesEDC Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bull 3X SharesEDZ Daily MSCI Emerging Markets Bear 3X SharesERX Daily Energy Bull 3X SharesERY Daily Energy Bear 3X SharesERYY Daily Energy Bear 1X SharesEUFL Daily MSCI European Financials Bull 2X SharesEUFS Daily MSCI European Financials Bear 1X SharesEURL Daily FTSE Europe Bull 3X SharesEUXL Daily EURO STOXX 50 Bull 3X SharesFAS Daily Financial Bull 3X SharesFAZ Daily Financial Bear 3X SharesFAZZ Daily Financial Bear 1X SharesGASL Daily Natural Gas Related Bull 3X SharesGASX Daily Natural Gas Related Bear 3X SharesGUSH Daily S&P Oil & Gas Exp. & Prod. Bull 3X SharesHAKK Daily Cyber Security & IT Bull 2X SharesHCYAX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – AHCYCX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – CHCYIX Direxion Hilton Tactical Income Fund – Inst.HYDD Daily High Yield Bear 2X SharesIBLN Direxion iBillionaire Index ETFINDL Daily MSCI India Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesJDST Daily Junior Gold Miners Index Bear 3X SharesJPNL Daily MSCI Japan Bull 3X SharesKNOW Direxion All Cap Insider Sentiment SharesKORU Daily MSCI South Korea Bull 3X SharesLABD Daily S&P Biotech Bear 3X SharesLABS Daily S&P Biotech Bear 1X SharesLABU Daily S&P Biotech Bull 3X SharesLBJ Daily Latin America Bull 3X SharesLLSC Daily Small Cap Bull 1.25X SharesLLSP Daily S&P 500 Bull 1.25X SharesMELT Daily Gold Miners Index Bear 1X SharesMEXX Daily MSCI Mexico Bull 3X SharesMIDU Daily Mid Cap Bull 3X SharesMIDZ Daily Mid Cap Bear 3X SharesNAIL Daily Homebuilders & Supplies Bull 3X SharesNUGT Daily Gold Miners Index Bull 3X SharesPEMVX Evolution Managed FundsQQQE Direxion NASDAQ-100 Equal Weighted Index SharesRETL Daily Retail Bull 3X SharesRUSL Daily Russia Bull 3X SharesRUSS Daily Russia Bear 3X SharesSAGG Daily Total Bond Market Bear 1X SharesSHNY Daily Silver Miners Index Bull 2X SharesSICK Daily Healthcare Bear 3X SharesSMLL Daily Small Cap Bull 2X SharesSOXL Daily Semiconductor Bull 3X SharesSOXS Daily Semiconductor Bear 3X SharesSPDN Daily S&P 500 Bear 1X SharesSPLZ Daily Consumer Staples Bear 1X SharesSPUU Daily S&P 500 Bull 2X SharesSPXL Daily S&P 500 Bull 3X SharesSPXS Daily S&P 500 Bear 3X SharesTECL Daily Technology Bull 3X SharesTECS Daily Technology Bear 3X SharesTECZ Daily Technology Bear 1X SharesTMF Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTMV Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTNA Daily Small Cap Bull 3X SharesTPOR Daily Transportation Bull 3X SharesTYBS Daily 20+ Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYD Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bull 3X SharesTYNS Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 1X SharesTYO Daily 7-10 Year Treasury Bear 3X SharesTZA Daily Small Cap Bear 3X SharesUTLZ Daily Utilities Bear 1X SharesUTSL Daily Utilities Bull 3X SharesWDRW Daily Regional Banks Bear 3X SharesYANG Daily FTSE China Bear 3X SharesYINN Daily FTSE China Bull 3X SharesZMLP Direxion Zacks MLP High Income Index Shares 









 




    Exchange-Traded Funds  





+ Share 



 
 









 The performance data quoted represents past performance. Past performance does not guarantee future results. The investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate. An investor’s shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost; current performance may be lower or higher than the performance quoted. Returns for performance for one year and under are cumulative, not annualized. Short term performance, in particular, is not a good indication of the fund’s future performance, and an investment should not be made based solely on returns. For additional information, see the fund(s) prospectus.
Each Direxion Fund share price is calculated as of the close of regular trading, usually as of 4:00 p.m. Eastern Time, each day the New York Stock Exchange is open for business. Each fund seeks to meet its investment objective relative to the value of the target index or benchmark as of 4:00 p.m.
Shares of Direxion Shares are bought and sold at market price (not NAV) and are not individually redeemed from the Fund. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns. Market Price returns are based upon the midpoint of the bid/ask spread at 4:00 PM Eastern time (when NAV is normally determined), and do not represent the returns you would receive if you traded shares at other times. Fund returns assume that dividends and capital gains distributions have been reinvested in the Fund at NAV. Some performance results reflect expense subsidies and waivers in effect during certain periods shown. Absent these waivers, results would have been less favorable.
After-Tax and After-Tax, Post Sales Returns
Tax-adjusted returns and tax cost ratio are estimates of the impact taxes have had on a fund. We assume the highest tax rate in calculating these figures. These returns follow the SEC guidelines for calculating returns before sale of shares. Tax-adjusted returns show a fund’s annualized after tax total return for the one, three and five year periods, excluding any capital-gains effects that would result from selling the fund at the end of the period. To determine this figure, all income and short-term capital gains distributions are taxed at the maximum federal rate at the time of distribution. Long-term capital gains are taxed at a 15% rate. The after tax portion is then assumed to be reinvested in the fund. State and local taxes are not included in our calculations. For more information, please consult your tax consultant.
Distribution Dates

Payable and Ex-Date – With regard to mutual funds, this is the day on which declared distributions (dividends or capital gains) are deducted from the fund’s assets before it calculates its net asset value (NAV). The NAV per share will drop by the amount of the distribution per share.
Record Date – Date by which a shareholder must officially own shares in order to be entitled to a dividend.

Types of Distributions

Income Dividend – A portion of a company’s profit paid to common and preferred shareholders.
Long Term Capital Gains – Profits distributed to shareholders resulting from the sale of securities held in the fund’s portfolio for more than one year.
Short Term Capital Gains – Profits distributed to shareholders resulting from the sale of securities held in the fund’s portfolio for less than one year


 











Related Reading

Knowledge
Related education, articles, and insights.



  ETF Market Pricing    


ETF market prices are the prices at which investors buy or sell shares of an ETF in the secondary market. While ETFs are designed to trade in line with their intraday values, during times of significant market volatility an ETF’s market price may vary more widely from its intraday value.


  ETF Liquidity – Four Rules to Consider    


Liquidity, transparency, real-time trading, and relatively low management fees are the reason why ETFs are becoming more and more popular. Learn about the four key characteristics that investors should better understand in order to trade them properly.
 More articles like this
 













